dictionaries/tr/index.aff
LANG tr_TR
SET UTF-8
TRY İiIıŞşÇçĞğÜüÖö-qwertyuopasdfghjklzxcvbnmQWERTYUOPASDFGHJKLZXCVBNM'
FLAG num

SFX 9999 N 1
SFX 9999 0 de .

SFX 1 N 1
SFX 1 0 dedir .

SFX 2 N 1
SFX 2 0 deki .

SFX 3 N 1
SFX 3 0 den .

SFX 4 N 1
SFX 4 0 deyse .

SFX 5 N 1
SFX 5 0 nin .

SFX 6 N 1
SFX 6 0 ye .

SFX 7 N 1
SFX 7 0 yi .

SFX 8 N 1
SFX 8 0 yle .

SFX 9 N 1
SFX 9 0 'nın .

SFX 10 N 1
SFX 10 0 'ya .

SFX 11 N 1
SFX 11 0 a .

SFX 12 N 1
SFX 12 0 sı .

SFX 13 N 1
SFX 13 0 dan .

SFX 14 N 1
SFX 14 0 lar .

SFX 15 N 1
SFX 15 0 larla .

SFX 16 N 1
SFX 16 0 nın .

SFX 17 N 1
SFX 17 0 ya .

SFX 18 N 1
SFX 18 0 yı .

SFX 19 N 1
SFX 19 0 yla .

SFX 20 N 1
SFX 20 0 da .

SFX 21 N 1
SFX 21 0 daki .

SFX 22 N 1
SFX 22 0 la .

SFX 23 N 1
SFX 23 0 lara .

SFX 24 N 1
SFX 24 0 larda .

SFX 25 N 1
SFX 25 0 lardan .

SFX 26 N 1
SFX 26 0 ları .

SFX 27 N 1
SFX 27 0 ların .

SFX 28 N 1
SFX 28 0 larına .

SFX 29 N 1
SFX 29 0 larından .

SFX 30 N 1
SFX 30 0 u .

SFX 31 N 1
SFX 31 0 un .

SFX 32 N 1
SFX 32 0 unu .

SFX 33 N 1
SFX 33 0 e .

SFX 34 N 1
SFX 34 0 le .

SFX 35 N 1
SFX 35 0 ler .

SFX 36 N 1
SFX 36 0 lerden .

SFX 37 N 1
SFX 37 0 lere .

SFX 38 N 1
SFX 38 0 leri .

SFX 39 N 1
SFX 39 0 lerin .

SFX 40 N 1
SFX 40 0 leriyiz .

SFX 41 N 1
SFX 41 0 lerle .

SFX 42 N 1
SFX 42 0 te .

SFX 43 N 1
SFX 43 0 ten .

SFX 44 N 1
SFX 44 0 ü .

SFX 45 N 1
SFX 45 0 ün .

SFX 46 N 1
SFX 46 0 ünü .

SFX 47 N 1
SFX 47 0 üyle .

SFX 48 N 1
SFX 48 0 larımızı .

SFX 49 N 1
SFX 49 0 larının .

SFX 50 N 1
SFX 50 0 larıyla .

SFX 51 N 1
SFX 51 0 dır .

SFX 52 N 1
SFX 52 0 tan .

SFX 53 N 1
SFX 53 0 n .

SFX 54 N 1
SFX 54 0 m .

SFX 55 N 1
SFX 55 0 ma .

SFX 56 N 1
SFX 56 0 mı .

SFX 57 N 1
SFX 57 0 na .

SFX 58 N 1
SFX 58 0 acağım .

SFX 59 N 1
SFX 59 0 lardı .

SFX 60 N 1
SFX 60 0 alım .

SFX 61 N 1
SFX 61 0 ın .

SFX 62 N 1
SFX 62 0 naydı .

SFX 63 N 1
SFX 63 0 ncasını .

SFX 64 N 1
SFX 64 0 nda .

SFX 65 N 1
SFX 65 0 ndan .

SFX 66 N 1
SFX 66 0 ndı .

SFX 67 N 1
SFX 67 0 ndık .

SFX 68 N 1
SFX 68 0 ndılar .

SFX 69 N 1
SFX 69 0 ndılardı .

SFX 70 N 1
SFX 70 0 nı .

SFX 71 N 1
SFX 71 0 ıyor .

SFX 72 N 1
SFX 72 0 ıyormuş .

SFX 73 N 1
SFX 73 0 z .

SFX 74 N 1
SFX 74 0 mış .

SFX 75 N 1
SFX 75 0 ır .

SFX 76 N 1
SFX 76 0 ırdı .

SFX 77 N 1
SFX 77 0 ırken .

SFX 78 N 1
SFX 78 0 ırlar .

SFX 79 N 1
SFX 79 0 ırsa .

SFX 80 N 1
SFX 80 0 ırsan .

SFX 81 N 1
SFX 81 0 ırsanız .

SFX 82 N 1
SFX 82 0 ını .

SFX 83 N 1
SFX 83 0 iyoruz .

SFX 84 N 1
SFX 84 0 ıyordu .

SFX 85 N 1
SFX 85 0 ıyorlar .

SFX 86 N 1
SFX 86 0 ıyorsunuz .

SFX 87 N 1
SFX 87 0 ıyorum .

SFX 88 N 1
SFX 88 0 ıyoruz .

SFX 89 N 1
SFX 89 0 nızın .

SFX 90 N 1
SFX 90 0 nla .

SFX 91 N 1
SFX 91 0 ta .

SFX 92 N 1
SFX 92 0 tır .

SFX 93 N 1
SFX 93 0 mıştı .

SFX 94 N 1
SFX 94 0 sın .

SFX 95 N 1
SFX 95 0 yacak .

SFX 96 N 1
SFX 96 0 yın .

SFX 97 N 1
SFX 97 0 nmış .

SFX 98 N 1
SFX 98 0 nmışım .

SFX 99 N 1
SFX 99 0 mışken .

SFX 100 N 1
SFX 100 0 nmışsanız .

SFX 101 N 1
SFX 101 0 mıştık .

SFX 102 N 1
SFX 102 0 mıştır .

SFX 103 N 1
SFX 103 0 nsa .

SFX 104 N 1
SFX 104 0 nsın .

SFX 105 N 1
SFX 105 0 di .

SFX 106 N 1
SFX 106 0 ecekti .

SFX 107 N 1
SFX 107 0 ir .

SFX 108 N 1
SFX 108 0 iriz .

SFX 109 N 1
SFX 109 0 irler .

SFX 110 N 1
SFX 110 0 irsiniz .

SFX 111 N 1
SFX 111 0 iyor .

SFX 112 N 1
SFX 112 0 iyorlar .

SFX 113 N 1
SFX 113 0 acağız .

SFX 114 N 1
SFX 114 0 acak .

SFX 115 N 1
SFX 115 0 acakmışım .

SFX 116 N 1
SFX 116 0 acaksınız .

SFX 117 N 1
SFX 117 0 larsa .

SFX 118 N 1
SFX 118 0 ayım .

SFX 119 N 1
SFX 119 0 ecek .

SFX 120 N 1
SFX 120 0 irdi .

SFX 121 N 1
SFX 121 0 lardır .

SFX 122 N 1
SFX 122 0 larıdır .

SFX 123 N 1
SFX 123 0 larımız .

SFX 124 N 1
SFX 124 0 larımıza .

SFX 125 N 1
SFX 125 0 larını .

SFX 126 N 1
SFX 126 0 dı .

SFX 127 N 1
SFX 127 0 dık .

SFX 128 N 1
SFX 128 0 larında .

SFX 129 N 1
SFX 129 0 dım .

SFX 130 N 1
SFX 130 0 dıysa .

SFX 131 N 1
SFX 131 0 sına .

SFX 132 N 1
SFX 132 0 sından .

SFX 133 N 1
SFX 133 0 sını .

SFX 134 N 1
SFX 134 0 sının .

SFX 135 N 1
SFX 135 0 ı .

SFX 136 N 1
SFX 136 0 ydı .

SFX 137 N 1
SFX 137 0 ymış .

SFX 138 N 1
SFX 138 0 ıyordur .

SFX 139 N 1
SFX 139 0 ysa .

SFX 140 N 1
SFX 140 0 tadır .

SFX 141 N 1
SFX 141 0 sa .

SFX 142 N 1
SFX 142 0 saydı .

SFX 143 N 1
SFX 143 0 sıdır .

SFX 144 N 1
SFX 144 0 sında .

SFX 145 N 1
SFX 145 0 sıydı .

SFX 146 N 1
SFX 146 0 sıyla .

SFX 147 N 1
SFX 147 0 sıysa .

SFX 148 N 1
SFX 148 0 yacaktı .

SFX 149 N 1
SFX 149 0 zdı .

SFX 150 N 1
SFX 150 0 zsa .

SFX 151 N 1
SFX 151 0 ına .

SFX 152 N 1
SFX 152 0 mışız .

SFX 153 N 1
SFX 153 0 mız .

SFX 154 N 1
SFX 154 0 nızla .

SFX 155 N 1
SFX 155 0 ırım .

SFX 156 N 1
SFX 156 0 ırız .

SFX 157 N 1
SFX 157 0 ırlardı .

SFX 158 N 1
SFX 158 0 ırlarsa .

SFX 159 N 1
SFX 159 0 ırsak .

SFX 160 N 1
SFX 160 0 ırsam .

SFX 161 N 1
SFX 161 0 ırsın .

SFX 162 N 1
SFX 162 0 ırsınız .

SFX 163 N 1
SFX 163 0 tı .

SFX 164 N 1
SFX 164 0 ımda .

SFX 165 N 1
SFX 165 0 ıyordum .

SFX 166 N 1
SFX 166 0 ıyorlardı .

SFX 167 N 1
SFX 167 0 ıyorlardır .

SFX 168 N 1
SFX 168 0 ıyormuşum .

SFX 169 N 1
SFX 169 0 ıyormuşuz .

SFX 170 N 1
SFX 170 0 ıyorsa .

SFX 171 N 1
SFX 171 0 ıyorsam .

SFX 172 N 1
SFX 172 0 ıyorsun .

SFX 173 N 1
SFX 173 0 ıyorumdur .

SFX 174 N 1
SFX 174 0 dılar .

SFX 175 N 1
SFX 175 0 dın .

SFX 176 N 1
SFX 176 0 dınız .

SFX 177 N 1
SFX 177 0 tadırlar .

SFX 178 N 1
SFX 178 0 larıydı .

SFX 179 N 1
SFX 179 0 sınız .

SFX 180 N 1
SFX 180 0 dırlar .

SFX 181 N 1
SFX 181 0 ydık .

SFX 182 N 1
SFX 182 0 yım .

SFX 183 N 1
SFX 183 0 yız .

SFX 184 N 1
SFX 184 0 nız .

SFX 185 N 1
SFX 185 0 nızda .

SFX 186 N 1
SFX 186 0 mın .

SFX 187 N 1
SFX 187 0 mıştım .

SFX 188 N 1
SFX 188 0 mıza .

SFX 189 N 1
SFX 189 0 mızın .

SFX 190 N 1
SFX 190 0 mızla .

SFX 191 N 1
SFX 191 0 nıza .

SFX 192 N 1
SFX 192 0 sak .

SFX 193 N 1
SFX 193 0 sanız .

SFX 194 N 1
SFX 194 0 saydık .

SFX 195 N 1
SFX 195 0 sınlar .

SFX 196 N 1
SFX 196 0 yacağım .

SFX 197 N 1
SFX 197 0 yacağız .

SFX 198 N 1
SFX 198 0 yacaksın .

SFX 199 N 1
SFX 199 0 yacaksınız .

SFX 200 N 1
SFX 200 0 yalım .

SFX 201 N 1
SFX 201 0 yayım .

SFX 202 N 1
SFX 202 0 yınız .

SFX 203 N 1
SFX 203 0 zdım .

SFX 204 N 1
SFX 204 0 zsam .

SFX 205 N 1
SFX 205 0 mışım .

SFX 206 N 1
SFX 206 0 mışızdır .

SFX 207 N 1
SFX 207 0 mışsın .

SFX 208 N 1
SFX 208 0 mışsınız .

SFX 209 N 1
SFX 209 0 salar .

SFX 210 N 1
SFX 210 0 tık .

SFX 211 N 1
SFX 211 0 tılar .

SFX 212 N 1
SFX 212 0 tım .

SFX 213 N 1
SFX 213 0 tın .

SFX 214 N 1
SFX 214 0 tınız .

SFX 215 N 1
SFX 215 0 tıydı .

SFX 216 N 1
SFX 216 0 asın .

SFX 217 N 1
SFX 217 0 'a .

SFX 218 N 1
SFX 218 0 yalar .

SFX 219 N 1
SFX 219 0 'da .

SFX 220 N 1
SFX 220 0 aydı .

SFX 221 N 1
SFX 221 0 aydın .

SFX 222 N 1
SFX 222 0 'ın .

SFX 223 N 1
SFX 223 0 ken .

SFX 224 N 1
SFX 224 0 larımızın .

SFX 225 N 1
SFX 225 0 'la .

SFX 226 N 1
SFX 226 0 'lar .

SFX 227 N 1
SFX 227 0 'ların .

SFX 228 N 1
SFX 228 0 'tan .

SFX 229 N 1
SFX 229 0 'dan .

SFX 230 N 1
SFX 230 0 'ı .

SFX 231 N 1
SFX 231 0 ıdır .

SFX 232 N 1
SFX 232 0 ım .

SFX 233 N 1
SFX 233 0 ınki .

SFX 234 N 1
SFX 234 0 ıydı .

SFX 235 N 1
SFX 235 0 ıyım .

SFX 236 N 1
SFX 236 0 dasın .

SFX 237 N 1
SFX 237 0 'de .

SFX 238 N 1
SFX 238 0 'deki .

SFX 239 N 1
SFX 239 0 'dekiler .

SFX 240 N 1
SFX 240 0 'dekilerden .

SFX 241 N 1
SFX 241 0 'dekilere .

SFX 242 N 1
SFX 242 0 'dekilerin .

SFX 243 N 1
SFX 243 0 'dekine .

SFX 244 N 1
SFX 244 0 'den .

SFX 245 N 1
SFX 245 0 'deydim .

SFX 246 N 1
SFX 246 0 'deyim .

SFX 247 N 1
SFX 247 0 'deyken .

SFX 248 N 1
SFX 248 0 'deymiş .

SFX 249 N 1
SFX 249 0 'dir .

SFX 250 N 1
SFX 250 0 'dedir .

SFX 251 N 1
SFX 251 0 'dekinden .

SFX 252 N 1
SFX 252 0 lerde .

SFX 253 N 1
SFX 253 0 lerdeki .

SFX 254 N 1
SFX 254 0 lerindeki .

SFX 255 N 1
SFX 255 0 lerine .

SFX 256 N 1
SFX 256 0 lerini .

SFX 257 N 1
SFX 257 0 si .

SFX 258 N 1
SFX 258 0 sindeki .

SFX 259 N 1
SFX 259 0 sinden .

SFX 260 N 1
SFX 260 0 sinin .

SFX 261 N 1
SFX 261 0 i .

SFX 262 N 1
SFX 262 0 idir .

SFX 263 N 1
SFX 263 0 im .
