dictionaries/tr/index.dic
elyafçı/12
kombi/9999,2,3,5,6,7,8,35,36,37,38,39,41,53,54,252,253,255,256,257,259,260,283,311,314,315,323,325,329,331,332,333,335,339,346,348,359,390,401,407,409,411,1484,1489,4072,5444,5532
koşturmuş/11,14,59,121
kuran/11,13,14,15,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,50,51,59,61,74,82,117,121,123,125,126,128,135,141,151,232,321,520,522,574,591,632,796,834,835,881,883,884,895,934,1053,1208
lisanslama/12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,24,26,125,131,132,134,146
mahvolma/12,16,17,18,53,73,74,94,95,102,131,132,133,134,146
mark/11,14,15,22,23,26,27,28,29,49,50,52,61,82,91,92,118,123,124,125,135,141,151,163,213,216,220,223,321,428,430,433,522,591,632,767,881,887,954,1134,1135,1137,1148,1149,1154,1155,1157
mide/9999,2,3,4,5,6,7,8,35,36,37,38,39,41,54,252,254,255,256,257,258,259,260,283,311,312,313,314,315,316,323,325,329,331,333,335,336,339,346,348,357,359,370,373,374,385,386,389,390,391,392,395,396,399,401,409,411,412,533,552,964,1235,1240,1243,1325,1358,1441,1484,1486,3129,3201,3449,5229
mitokondri/9999,2,5,6,7,8,35,36,37,38,39,41,252,258,259,315,335
morfoloji/2,5,6,7,38,255,257,260,314,315,355,359
mumyalama/16,17,19,20,134,153
müessese/9999,2,3,5,6,7,8,35,36,37,38,39,41,252,253,254,255,256,257,258,259,260,283,311,313,314,315,325,327,328,329,331,333,335,339,345,346,348,349,355,359,363,365,370,373,374,377,382,389,391,395,407,411,414,416,420,1183,1239,1240,1491
nalbantçı/14,23,26,27
odaklamak/22,52,91,865
olgunlaştırma/12,13,16,17,18,20,26,54,73,74,102,125,131,133,136,146,150,153,194,457
oportünistlik/34,43,256
öykünme/9999,3,5,6,7,8,35,38,39,41,73,105,255,256,257,259,284,313,314,315,333,335,339,343,349,365,389,413,650,652,1165,1288
psikoz/11,13,14,20,22,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,49,50,662,664,665,1102,1110,1111,1116,1419
reaksiyon/11,13,14,15,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,48,49,50,121,122,123,125,128,439,441,661,662,664,665,1102,1103,1106,1107,1108,1109,1110,1111,1112,1113,1116,2769
sataşma/12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,49,50,51,54,73,74,94,96,121,125,126,128,129,131,132,133,134,141,144,145,146,149,191,193,196,439,448,577,582
seciye/5,6,7,35,38,39,256,257,258,259,260,311,313,314,315,323,325,333,335,346,359,389,391,395,407
sirke/9999,3,5,6,7,8,35,36,37,38,39,53,54,252,255,256,257,259,260,311,312,313,314,315,331,335,349,355,359,383,390,407,409,2993
stil/9999,1,2,3,4,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,41,105,252,253,254,255,256,261,262,263,264,266,267,268,269,270,271,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,279,280,281,282,283,284,328,329,333,335,336,339,341,361,539,548,649,654,681,967,968,970,975,976,977,1184,1230,1236,1245,1251,1254,1453,1850,1852,2570,3106
sucu/13,14,15,17,19,20,23,25,26,27,29,53,54,57,64,65,117,516,517,534,733,1434,1436,1631,1646,2114,2453
sunulan/11,13,14,15,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,61,114,121,135,151
şarkıcı/12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,48,49,50,51,53,54,59,70,94,117,121,122,123,125,128,131,132,133,134,136,137,139,143,144,145,146,147,153,179,182,183,184,188,189,190,224,435,437,449,453,472,474,476,488,507,524,580,588,616,805,806,834,928,934,1053,1071,1151,1547,2699
tabur/11,13,14,15,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,49,50,123,125,128,224,486,524,662,664,665,796,934,952,1102,1103,1106,1108,1109,1110,1111,1112,1114,1116,1339,1419,1626,2148,2769,3351,3394,3400
takıcı/12,14,16,17,20,24,26,27,29
tampon/11,13,14,15,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,49,50,122,123,125,128,662,664,665,1103,1107,1110,1111,1116,1419,2517
teizm/33,34,261,272,275,277
tekelleşme/9999,3,5,6,7,8,35,37,38,39,255,257,259,260,284,314,315,335,359
tezene/3,5,7,257,260,314,315,359
topaç/14,15,22,23,25,26,27,28,29,52,74,125,163,430,437,469,835
Tura/9,10
üçkağıtçı/12,13,14,15,16,17,18,20,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,49,51,54,131,132,136,137,153,179,183
Vela/9
yarıcı/12,13,14,16,17,18,20,27,153
yazılı/12,13,14,15,17,18,20,23,24,25,26,27,28,49,51,54,55,56,123,125,128,131,132,133,136,137,139,143,144,146,153,182,186,446,447,448,449,450,459,461,507,879,893,914,992,2154
zikir/9999,3,34,35,36,37,38,39,41,105,252,255,256,283,284,319,333,335,339,365,369,373
